District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.13

Resumption of business by a merchant bank.

A merchant bank of which the Commissioner takes possession or which is operating under restrictions imposed by the Commissioner may be permitted by the Commissioner to resume business in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and subject to such conditions as may be imposed by the Commissioner.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 313, 48 DCR 3244